Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 6. First Aid Equipment; Medical Care; Emergency Medical Services Providers.

§ 45.2-861.
First aid equipment.

Each mine shall have adequate supplies of first aid equipment as determined by the Chief. Such supplies shall be located on the surface, at the bottom of each shaft and slope, and at other strategic locations near the working faces, as the Chief prescribes. Such first aid supplies shall be encased in suitable sanitary receptacles designed to be reasonably dust-tight and moisture-proof. Such supplies shall be available for use of any person employed in the mine. No first aid material shall be removed or diverted without authorization except in case of injury at the mine.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-69.6; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-101; 1978, c. 94; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.197; 1999, c. 256; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-862.
Attention to injured persons.

When an injury occurs underground, the injured person shall be brought promptly to the surface. Prompt medical attention shall be provided in the event of injury, and adequate facilities shall be made available for transporting such injured person to a hospital if necessary.

Safe transportation shall be provided to carry an injured person from the site where the injury occurred to the surface of the mine.

The operator of each mine shall post directional signs that are conspicuously located to identify the routes of ingress to and egress from any mine located off of a public road.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-69.6; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-101; 1978, c. 94; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.198; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-863.
Certified emergency medical services providers.

At each mine, the mine operator shall station at least one person who is a working coal miner and who holds a valid certificate as an emergency medical services provider issued pursuant to §

32.1-111.5

so as to make such person available for duty during any time when miners are working at such mine. Such operator shall utilize enough such providers to assure that workers in any mine location can be reached by a provider within a reasonable time as determined by the Chief. Each provider shall have available to him at all times the necessary equipment, as specified by the Chief, for prompt response to emergencies. Telephone facilities or their equivalent shall be installed to provide two-way voice communication between such provider and medical personnel outside the mine.

If an insufficient number of qualified miners at a particular mine volunteer to serve as providers pursuant to this section, the operator may utilize the services of first aid trainees, in such numbers as the Chief determines to be appropriate.

History.

1977, c. 679, § 45.1-101.1; 1978, c. 94; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.199; 2015, cc. 502, 503; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.